derivation_lexicon.lexc
!!!!!!!! LEXICON FOR NOMINAL-TO-VERB DERIVATION IN FINNISH !!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols
	+N 		! Noun tag
	+A	 	! Adjective tag
	+Caus	! Causative suffix
	+Transl	! Translative suffix
	+Freq	! Frequentative suffix
	+Inf	! A-Infinitive suffix
! ------ Stem endings----------------!
	@U.END.C@	! consonant ending stem
	@R.END.C@	! require cons ending stem
	@D.END.C@	! (disallow cons ending ->) vowel ending stem
	@U.END.U@	! u- or y-ending stem
	@D.END.U@	! disallow u/y-ending
	@U.END.A@	! a- or ä-ending stem
	@R.END.A@	! require a/ä-ending stem
	@D.END.A@	! disallow a/ä-ending
! ------ Adjective endings----------------!
	@U.ADJ.EA@	! adjective ending in -eA, -ee or -aa
	@R.ADJ.EA@	! require -eA, -ee or -aa-ending
! -------Gradation -----------------------!
	@U.GRAD.S@	! strong form of stem ("kunto-", not "kunno-")
	@D.GRAD.S@	! disallow strong form
	@U.GRAD.W@	! weak form of stem ("kunno-", not "kunto-"
	@D.GRAD.W@	! disallow weak from
!-------- Number of syllables ------------!
	@U.SYL.2@	! 2 syllables in stem
	@R.SYL.2@	! require 2 syllables
	@U.SYL.3@	! 3 syllables in stem
	@R.SYL.3@	! require 3 syllables
		

LEXICON Root
	Nouns ;
	Adjectives ; 

!---------------- NOUN STEMS -----------------!

LEXICON Nouns
@U.SYL.3@:@U.SYL.3@	Nouns3Syl ;
@U.SYL.2@:@U.SYL.2@	Nouns2Syl ;

LEXICON Nouns2Syl
@U.END.A@:@U.END.A@     NounsEndsA ;
arvo			N ;
kunto@U.GRAD.W@:kunno@U.GRAD.W@		N ;
kunto@U.GRAD.S@:kunto@U.GRAD.S@		N ;
jarru@U.END.U@		N ;
paino			N ;
sammal@U.END.C@		N ;
sävel@U.END.C@		N ;
sieni:siene		N ;
sävy@U.END.U@		N ;
savu@U.END.U@		N ;
teho			N ;
teksti			N ;
tieto:tiedo@U.GRAD.W@	N ;
tieto@U.GRAD.S@		N ;

LEXICON NounsEndsA
haara                   N ;
haava                   N ;
harha                   N ;
aika:aja@U.GRAD.W@      N ;
aika@U.GRAD.S@          N ;
kala			N ;
maja			N ;
marja			N ;

LEXICON Nouns3Syl
ankkuri        	N ;
raunio         	N ;
vartio		N ;
henkilö       	N ;
luettelo	N ;
idea@U.END.A@	N ;
kunnia@U.END.A@	N ;

!--------------- ADJECTIVE STEMS ---------------!

LEXICON Adjectives
@U.END.C@:@U.END.C@		InenAdjectives ;
@U.ADJ.EA@:@U.ADJ.EA@		EaAdjectives ;
@U.SYL.3@:@U.SYL.3@		Adj3Syl;
0:0				OtherAdjectives ;

LEXICON InenAdjectives
havainnollinen		A ;
itsenäinen		A ;
kurinalainen		A ;
kansallinen		A ;
kaupallinen		A ;
kerronnallinen		A ;
koneellinen		A ; 
käsitteellinen		A ;
maallinen		A ;
myöhäinen		A ;
suomalainen		A ;


LEXICON EaAdjectives 	! Adjectives ending in -AA, -eA or -ee
ankea           A ;
kapea           A ;
eheä		A ;
kiinteä		A ;
kostea 		A ;
nopea		A ;
vapaa           A ;
tuore		A ; ! the stem is actually "tuoree-" -> "tuoree-n" etc.

LEXICON Adj3Syl 	! Adjectives with 3-syllable stems
autio		A ;
rehevä		A ;
katkera 	A ;
kitkerä		A ;
hankala		A ;
vakava		A ;

LEXICON OtherAdjectives
harras@U.END.C@		A ;
kaunis@U.END.C@		A ;
kirkas@U.END.C@		A ;
kumara:kumar@U.END.C@	A ;
rikas@U.END.C@		A ;

!--------------------- DERIVATION --------------------!

LEXICON N
+N:^	DerivationNouns ;

LEXICON A
+A:^	DerivationAdj ;

LEXICON DerivationNouns
0:0		# ;		! no derivation
0:0		CausativeNouns ;
0:0		TranslativeNouns ;
! 0@D.GRAD.W@:0@D.GRAD.W@		Frequentative ; ! -ele and -ile with strong forms (NOT IN USE FOR NOW)

LEXICON DerivationAdj
0:0             # ;             ! no derivation
0:0             CausativeAdj ;
0:0             TranslativeAdj ;


! -------------- DERIVATIVE SUFFIXES WITH A GENERALLY CAUSATIVE MEANING ------------------- ! (+Caus used as tag)

! ---------------------Nouns------------------------!
LEXICON CausativeNouns
@R.SYL.2@:@R.SYL.2@	CausNoun2 ;
@R.SYL.3@:@R.SYL.3@     CausNoun3 ;

LEXICON CausNoun2
+Caus@R.END.C@:tA@R.END.C@ 				FreqOrEnding ; ! 2-syllable C-ending stems: "mainos-taa"
+Caus@D.END.C@@D.GRAD.S@:ttA@D.END.C@@D.GRAD.S@		FreqOrEnding ; ! weak 2-syllable V-ending stems: "jarru-ttaa"
+Caus@D.END.C@@D.GRAD.S@:stA@D.END.C@@D.GRAD.S@ 	FreqOrEnding ; ! weak 2-syllable V-ending stems: "tiedo-staa"
+Caus@R.END.A@@D.GRAD.S@:ittA@R.END.A@@D.GRAD.S@	FreqOrEnding ; ! weak 2-syllable A-ending stems: "lahja" -> "lahjo-itta-a"

LEXICON CausNoun3
+Caus@R.END.A@:ittA@R.END.A@				VerbEnding ; ! 3-syllable A-ending stem "kunnio-itta-a"
+Caus@D.END.C@:Oi@D.END.C@			 	VerbEnding ; ! weak 3-syllable A/i/O-ending stem

! ---------------------Adjectives---------------------!
LEXICON CausativeAdj
+Caus@R.END.C@:tA@R.END.C@                  FreqOrEnding ; ! 2-syllable C-ending "kaunis-taa" or -inen adjectives
+Caus@R.ADJ.EA@:UttA@R.ADJ.EA@				FreqOrEnding ; ! eA-ending "koste-uttaa" OR ee/AA-ending stems: "vapa-utta-a" 
+Caus@R.SYL.3@:OittA@R.SYL.3@				FreqOrEnding ; ! 3-syllable A-ending stems "rehev-öittä-ä"


! ------- DERIVATIVE SUFFIXES WITH A TRANSLATIVE, RECEPTIVE OR DIRECTIONAL MEANING ------------ ! (+Transl used as tag)

! ---------------------Nouns------------------------!
LEXICON TranslativeNouns
@R.SYL.2@:@R.SYL.2@	TranslNoun2 ;
@R.SYL.3@:@R.SYL.3@     TranslNoun3 ;

LEXICON TranslNoun2
+Transl@D.END.C@@D.END.U@@D.GRAD.W@:UtU@D.END.C@@D.END.U@@D.GRAD.W@	VerbEnding ; ! strong 2-syl V-ending (but not U-ending) stems "muoto-utu-a", "selke-yty-ä"
+Transl@D.END.C@@D.END.A@@D.GRAD.S@:ttU@D.END.C@@D.END.A@@D.GRAD.S@	VerbEnding ; ! weak 2-syl V-ending (but not A-ending) stems "paino-ttu-a" // compare to -ttA
+Transl@R.END.A@@D.GRAD.S@:ittU@R.END.A@@D.GRAD.S@	VerbEnding ; ! weak 2-syl A-ending stems "haara" -> "haaro-ittu-a"
+Transl@R.END.C@:OitU@R.END.C@				VerbEnding ; ! 2-syl C-ending noun: "sammal-oitu-a" // counterpart caus. -Oi

LEXICON TranslNoun3
+Transl:OitU				VerbEnding ; ! 3-syllable stems "ankkur-oitu-a" // counterpart caus. -Oi

! ---------------------Adjectives---------------------!
LEXICON TranslativeAdj
+Transl@R.END.C@:tU@R.END.C@				VerbEnding ; ! c-ending stems, e.g. -inen-adjectives
+Transl@R.ADJ.EA@:UtU@R.ADJ.EA@     			VerbEnding ; ! -eA/-AA/-ee-ending stems: "vapa-utu-a" // counterpart caus. -UttA 
+Transl@R.SYL.3@:OitU@R.SYL.3@                          VerbEnding ; ! 3-syllable stems "rehev-öity-ä" // counterpart caus. -Oitta


!------------------ POSSIBLE ENDINGS ---------------------------------- !
LEXICON FreqOrEnding    ! for causative verbs
        Frequentative ;
        VerbEnding ;


! ------- DERIVATIVE SUFFIXES WITH A FREQUENTATIVE MEANING ------------ ! (+Freq used as tag)

LEXICON Frequentative
! +Freq:ile		VerbEnding ; ! mostly to nominal stems: "kunto-ill-a"
 +Freq:ele		VerbEnding ; ! can be added to most causative verbs: "kunno-st-ell-a"


LEXICON VerbEnding
+Inf:%#A	# ; ! A-infinitive ending


END
